Illinois, session 104th, SB850.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public-Private Partnerships for 5Transportation Act is amended by changing Section 1 as 6follows: 7    (630 ILCS 5/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.10(Source: P.A. 97-502, eff. 8-23-11.)